src/scripts/Kyrgyz/english_phone_mapping.foma
# Copyright (C) 2017  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Mapping 
aa -> a1 ,, 
aa0 -> a0 ,, 
aa1 -> a1 ,, 
ae -> e1 ,, 
ae0 -> e0 ,, 
ae1 -> e1 ,, 
ah -> a1 ,, 
ah0 -> a0 ,, 
ah1 -> a1 ,, 
ao -> o1 ,, 
ao0 -> o1 ,, 
ao1 -> o1 ,, 
aw -> a1 u0 ,, 
aw1 -> a1 u0 ,, 
aw0 -> a0 u0 ,, 
ax -> e0 ,, 
ax0 -> e0 ,, 
ax1 -> e1 ,, 
ay -> a1 j ,, 
ay0 -> a0 j ,, 
ay1 -> a1 j ,, 
eh -> e1 ,, 
eh0 -> e0 ,, 
eh1 -> e1 ,, 
er -> of1 r ,, 
er0 -> e0 r ,, 
er1 -> of1 r ,, 
ey -> e1 j ,, 
ey0 -> e0 j ,, 
ey1 -> e1 j ,, 
ih -> i1 ,, 
ih0 -> i0 ,, 
ih1 -> i1 ,, 
iy -> i1 ,, 
iy0 -> i0 ,, 
iy1 -> i1 ,, 
ow -> o1 u0 ,, 
ow0 -> o1 u0 ,, 
ow1 -> o1 u0 ,, 
oy -> o1 j ,, 
oy0 -> o1 j ,, 
oy1 -> o1 j ,, 
uh -> u1 ,, 
uh0 -> u0 ,, 
uh1 -> u1 ,, 
uw -> u1 ,, 
uw0 -> u0 ,, 
uw1 -> u1 ,, 
b -> b ,, 
ch -> ch ,, 
d -> d ,, 
dh -> z ,, 
f -> f ,, 
g -> g ,, 
hh -> h ,, 
jh -> dzh ,, 
k -> k ,, 
l -> l ,, 
m -> m ,, 
n -> n ,, 
ng -> ng ,, 
p -> p ,, 
r -> r ,, 
s -> s ,, 
sh -> sh ,, 
t -> t ,, 
th -> s ,, 
v -> v ,, 
w -> v ,, 
y -> j ,, 
z -> z ,, 
zh -> zh ; 

define FixA [ax|ax1|ax0]:[e1 j] ; 

regex 
FixA .P. Mapping ;
